ubuntu.slaves.black/4/packages/ispell-et/src/latin-1/estonian.aff
# rule/flag 32 (affects 28043 words, has 921 subrules):
flag b:
	A G A	>	-GA,D
	E G A	>	-GA,DKI
	[IU] G A	>	-GA,T
	U G A	>	-GA,TKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,B
	E N U D	>	-NUD,BKI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,D
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAGU
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAGUGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAKS
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAKSKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMA
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMAGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATU
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUD
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUDKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUGA
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUGAGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUID
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUIDKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUIGA
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUIGAGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUIKS
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUIKSKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUIL
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUILE
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUILEGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUILGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUILT
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUILTKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUINA
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUINAGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUINI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUINIGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUIS
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUISKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUISSE
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUISSEGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUIST
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUISTKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUITA
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUITAGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUKS
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUKSKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUL
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATULE
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATULEGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATULGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATULT
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATULTKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUNA
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUNAGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUNI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUNIGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUS
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUSKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUSSE
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUSSEGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUST
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUSTKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUT
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTA
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTAGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTE
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTEGA
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTEGAGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTEGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTEKS
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTEKSKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTEL
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTELE
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTELEGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTELGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTELT
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTELTKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTENA
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTENAGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTENI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTENIGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTES
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTESKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTESSE
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTESSEGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTEST
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTESTKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTETA
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTETAGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAMATUTKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAV
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVA
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAD
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVADKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAGA
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAGAGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAID
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAIDKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAIGA
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAIGAGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAIKS
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAIKSKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAIL
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAILE
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAILEGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAILGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAILT
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAILTKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAINA
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAINAGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAINI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAINIGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAIS
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAISKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAISSE
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAISSEGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAIST
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAISTKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAITA
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAITAGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAKS
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAKSKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAL
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVALE
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVALEGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVALGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVALT
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVALTKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVANA
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVANAGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVANI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVANIGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAS
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVASKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVASSE
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVASSEGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAST
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVASTKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVAT
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATA
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATAGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATE
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATEGA
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATEGAGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATEGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATEKS
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATEKSKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATEL
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATELE
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATELEGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATELGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATELT
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATELTKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATENA
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATENAGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATENI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATENIGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATES
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATESKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATESSE
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATESSEGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATEST
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATESTKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATETA
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATETAGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVATKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUS
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSE
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSED
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEDKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEGA
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEGAGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEID
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEIDKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEIGA
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEIGAGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEIKS
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEIKSKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEIL
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEILE
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEILEGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEILGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEILT
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEILTKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEINA
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEINAGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEINI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEINIGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEIS
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEISKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEISSE
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEISSEGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEIST
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEISTKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEITA
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEITAGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEKS
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEKSKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEL
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSELE
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSELEGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSELGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSELT
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSELTKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSENA
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSENAGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSENI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSENIGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSES
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSESKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSESSE
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSESSEGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSEST
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSESTKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSETA
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSETAGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSIGA
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSIGAGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSIGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSIKS
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSIKSKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSIL
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSILE
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSILEGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSILGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSILT
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSILTKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSINA
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSINAGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSINI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSINIGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSIS
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSISKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSISSE
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSISSEGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSIST
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSISTKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSITA
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSITAGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSSE
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSSEGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUST
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSTE
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSTEGA
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSTEGAGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSTEGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSTEKS
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSTEKSKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSTEL
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSTELE
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSTELEGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSTELGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSTELT
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSTELTKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSTENA
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSTENAGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSTENI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSTENIGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSTES
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSTESKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSTESSE
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSTESSEGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSTEST
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSTESTKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSTETA
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSTETAGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DAVUSTKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DIGI
	E N U D	>	-NUD,DKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DU
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DUD
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DUDKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DUGA
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DUGAGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DUGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DUID
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DUIDKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DUIGA
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DUIGAGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DUIKS
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DUIKSKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DUIL
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DUILE
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DUILEGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DUILGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DUILT
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DUILTKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DUIM
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DUIMA
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DUIMAD
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DUIMADKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DUIMAGA
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DUIMAGAGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DUIMAGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DUIMAID
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DUIMAIDKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DUIMAIGA
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DUIMAIGAGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DUIMAIKS
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DUIMAIKSKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DUIMAIL
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DUIMAILE
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DUIMAILEGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DUIMAILGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DUIMAILT
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DUIMAILTKI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DUIMAINA
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DUIMAINAGI
	I N U D	>	-NUD,DUIMAINI
