ubuntu.slaves.black/4/packages/ispell-et/src/latin-1/estonian.dict
aetanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
aimlematuga/abcdefgkmoy
alatisega/abdhjlmny
amfiboolsega/abcdefhjklmnoy
annetusega/abhilmny
aredaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
arvega/abcefhiklmny
asurkonnaga/abcfiky
autorsusega/abhilmny
bikuupvõrrandiga/abcehijlmoy
burgeriga/abcehijlmoy
detonaatoriga/abcehijlmoy
dissonantsega/abcdefhjklmnoy
edelaga/abcdefgikmnoy
eitavusega/abehklmny
elatanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
energeetilisusega/abehklmny
eristatavusega/abehiklmny
eurooplasega/abehiklmny
filigraansega/abcdefhjklmnoy
frivoolsusega/abehklmny
glandulaarsusega/abehklmny
haaravusega/abehklmny
halgsega/abcdefhjklmnoy
hargilisega/abdhjlmny
heegeldisega/abhilmny
helklemisega/abhlmny
hiiglusega/abehiklmny
hobusega/abehiklmny
hosiannaga/abcdfghiky
huulikuga/abcdefgikmoy
hääldanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
hõõrduvusega/abhilmny
hüübjusega/abehklmny
iilinguga/abcdefgikmoy
immega/abhilmny
inkassaatoriga/abcehijlmoy
isaga/abcfhiky
jahmerdanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
joodulisega/abhilmny
julgustanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
jälestusega/abhilmny
jäävaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
kaalulisega/abdhjlmny
kaelsega/abcdefhjklmnoy
kaigutamatuga/abcdefgkmoy
kalkaga/abcdfghiky
kangelasega/abhilmny
kardajaga/abcdefgkmnoy
kasinusega/abehiklmny
kauasusega/abehklmny
keeremusega/abehklmny
kelmikusega/abehiklmny
ketaslasega/abhilmny
kiigatsiga/abcehijlmoy
kildalisusega/abehklmny
kiprusega/abehiklmny
kitsenemusega/abehiklmny
kliivriga/abcehijlmoy
koetavusega/abehklmny
koidetavusega/abehklmny
kolossaalsega/abcdefhjklmnoy
konditsioonilisusega/abehklmny
konverditavusega/abehklmny
koostisega/abehiklmny
korratuga/abcdefgijklmnoy
kraatriga/abcehijlmoy
kriskaga/abcdfghiky
krõmpsutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kulendiga/abcehijlmoy
kuraasikusega/abehklmny
kuukamatuga/abcdefgkmoy
käginaga/abcdefgikmnoy
kärinaga/abcdefgikmnoy
kääritanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kõlkasega/abdehjklmnoy
kõrvega/abhilmny
küberneetilisega/abdhjlmny
kütkendanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
ladnaga/abcdfghkly
lahutatavusega/abehklmny
lambilisega/abdhjlmny
latardiga/abcehijlmoy
leeliselisusega/abehklmny
leiundusega/abhilmny
letuga/abcdeghimy
liigendiga/abcehijlmoy
linasusega/abehklmny
lodisenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
lompsanud/abcefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
lopsanud/abcefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
lurbitavaga/abcdefgkmnoy
läkiga/abcefhijkly
lõhkamatuga/abcdefgkmoy
lõpusesega/abhilmny
lühistanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
magedaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
makroskoopilisusega/abehklmny
marmelaadisusega/abehklmny
meelitavaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
mesikaga/abcdefgikmnoy
minekuga/abcdefgikmoy
montaansega/abcdefhjklmnoy
muldajaga/abcdefgkmnoy
musikaalsega/abcdefhjklmnoy
mäletsejalisega/abhilmny
mõõdetavaga/abcdefgkmnoy
nainud/abdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
niisutiga/abcehijlmoy
nuiakusega/abehklmny
närvilisusega/abehiklmny
ogajaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
organisaatoriga/abcehijlmoy
pahvanud/abcefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
pantomiimilisusega/abehklmny
pealsega/abcdefhijklmnoy
pidurdusega/abhilmny
pilvitusega/abhilmny
plingitavaga/abcdefgkmnoy
portsjonilisega/abdhjlmny
prostousega/abehklmny
pumpamisega/abhlmny
pärgamentjaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
põselisusega/abehklmny
rahesega/abdehjklmnoy
reaktoriga/abcehijlmoy
riginaga/abcdefgikmnoy
rohtsusega/abehklmny
räbustanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
rühitusega/abhilmny
sakuskaga/abcdfghiky
seemlaga/abcdefgikmnoy
seroossega/abcdefhjklmnoy
sinatanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
sogasega/abdehjklmnoy
sotsiaalsusega/abehklmny
suhtelisega/abdhjlmny
suunistanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
sõnakusega/abehiklmny
süsijusega/abehklmny
takistanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
tasuvusega/abehklmny
teolisega/abehiklmny
tillukesusega/abehklmny
toonilisusega/abehklmny
triljonendaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
tujukaga/abcdefgjklmnoy
tuuletuga/abcdefgjklmnoy
tõmmakuga/abcdefgikmoy
tünnakusega/abehklmny
unitaarsusega/abehklmny
vahajusega/abehklmny
valutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
vedeldiga/abcehijlmoy
vietnamlasega/abhilmny
viljatuga/abcdefgjklmnoy
volilisusega/abehklmny
väljendiga/abcehijlmoy
võituga/abcdefgijklmnoy
ärastanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
õngelisega/abhilmny
üritusega/abhilmny
